Vermont, session 2025-2026, H282.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 607 is amended to read:
§ 607. JUNIOR OPERATOR’S LICENSE
(a) A junior operator’s license may be issued initially only to persons who:
(1) are 16 and 17 years of age;
(2) have passed the driver examination required in subchapter 2 of this
chapter and a driver education and training course approved by the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of Education pursuant to
16 V.S.A. § 1044 or 1045; and
(3) have:
(A) possessed a learner’s permit for not less than one year;
(B) submitted on a form provided by the Department of Motor
Vehicles that is approved by the Commissioner, and certified by the operator’s
licensed parent or guardian, licensed or certified driver education instructor, or
licensed person at least 25 years of age that there was at least 40 hours of
practice behind the wheel, at least 10 of which was nighttime driving and that
the operator was accompanied by his or her the operator’s licensed parent or
guardian, a licensed or certified driver education instructor, or another licensed
individual at least 25 years of age, riding in the front passenger seat; and
(C) maintained a driving record without a learner’s permit
suspension, revocation, or recall for six consecutive months prior to licensure.
VT LEG #380451 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.282
2025 Page 3 of 6
* * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. chapter 23, subchapter 5 is amended to read:
Subchapter 5. Student Driver Education and Training Program
§ 1044. DRIVER EDUCATION; HOME STUDY PROGRAM
(a) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of Education
shall approve one or more driver education and training courses, which shall
include a behind-the-wheel driver training component, suitable for a parent or
guardian of a high-school-age student enrolled in a home study program under
the provisions of section 166b of this title to use for teaching a home study
student.
(b) All driver education and training courses approved under this section
shall include:
(1) a course of instruction approved by the State Board on the effects of
alcohol and drugs on driving;
(2) instruction on motor vehicle liability insurance and the motor vehicle
financial responsibility laws of the State; and
(3) instruction on the adverse environmental, health, economic, and
other effects of unnecessary idling of motor vehicles and on the law governing
prohibited idling of motor vehicles.
(c) A course approved under this section may only be taught:
VT LEG #380451 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.282
2025 Page 4 of 6
(1) to a student enrolled in a home study program who is at least 15
years of age; and
(2) by the student’s parent or guardian who has not done any of the
following:
(A) had six or more points assessed under 23 V.S.A. § 2502 in the
three years prior to the student beginning instruction;
(B) been convicted of operating under the influence under 23 V.S.A.
§ 1201, 1216, or 1218 in the 11 years prior to the student beginning
instruction; or
(C) been convicted of a felony as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1.
(d) Notwithstanding section 1048 of this subchapter, a parent or guardian
who is teaching a home study student under a driver education and training
course approved under this section may utilize any instructional materials and
visual aids provided that the parent is teaching the approved driver education
and training course.
§ 1045. DRIVER TRAINING COURSE EDUCATION; PUBLIC AND
INDEPENDENT HIGH SCHOOL
(a) A driver education and training course, approved by the Agency of
Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles, The Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles and the Secretary of Education shall approve driver education and
training courses suitable for a licensed driver education instructor to use for
VT LEG #380451 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.282
2025 Page 5 of 6
teaching a high school student to drive safely, which shall be made available to
students whose parent or guardian is a resident of Vermont and who have
reached their 15th birthday are at least 15 years of age and who are regularly
enrolled in a public or independent high school approved by the State Board.
(b) After June 30, 1984, all All driver education and training courses
approved under this section shall include:
(1) a course of instruction approved by the State Board and the council
on the effects of alcohol and drugs on driving.;
(c) All driver education courses shall include
(2) instruction on motor vehicle liability insurance and the motor vehicle
financial responsibility laws of the State.; and
(d) All driver education courses shall include
(3) instruction on the adverse environmental, health, economic, and
other effects of unnecessary idling of motor vehicles and on the law governing
prohibited idling of motor vehicles.
* * *
§ 1048. ADMINISTRATION
The administration of this subchapter, including the training and
qualification of instructors and selection of instructional material and visual
aids, shall be in the Agency.
VT LEG #380451 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.282
2025 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION; REPORT
(a) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of Education
shall approve at least one driver education and training course pursuant to
16 V.S.A. § 1044 as added by Sec. 2 of this act not later than July 1, 2025.
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall gather aggregate data that
enables a written comparison of the driving records of operators who received
a junior operator’s license following participation in a driver education and
training course approved pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 1044 with those who
received a junior operator’s license following participation in a driver
education and training course approved pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 1045. The
Commissioner shall file the written comparison with the House and Senate
Committees on Education and on Transportation not later than November 15,
2029.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380451 v.1